Delaware, session 153, SB190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Part II, Title 3 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Chapter 20. State-Owned Agricultural Land Leases Â§ 2001. Definitions. For purposes of this chapter, âState-owned agricultural landâ means land of 10 acres or more that is owned by this State or a political subdivision of this State and that is used or intended to be used for agricultural use, as defined under Â§ 902 of this title. Â§ 2002. Notice requirements. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, when this State or a political subdivision of this State seeks bids to lease State-owned agricultural land for either a short-term or long-term lease period, notice of the request for bids must be provided to the Delaware Farm Bureau, or successor of that organization, to be distributed or made available to farmers. (b) The notice requirement under subsection (a) of this section is in addition to any other notice required for procurement of bids to lease land owned by this State or a political subdivision of this State under State or local law, ordinance, or regulation. (c) The notice requirement under subsection (a) of this section does not apply to the renewal of an existing lease when the tenant remains the same.